Hawaii statutes.
PART VI.
VICTIMS PROTECTIONS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2011, c 206, §3(1).

[A.] General
Provisions

Note

Section 378-71 designated as Subpart A by L 2011, c 206, §3(2).

[§378-71] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Child" means an individual who is a
biological, adopted, or foster son or daughter; a stepchild; or a legal ward of
an employee.

"Course of conduct" means acts over
any period of time of repeatedly maintaining a visual or physical proximity to
a person or conveying verbal or written threats, including threats conveyed
through electronic communications or threats implied by conduct.

"Domestic abuse" means conduct
defined in section 586-1.

"Domestic or sexual violence" means
domestic abuse, sexual assault, or stalking.

"Electronic communications" includes
communications via telephone, mobile phone, computer, e-mail, video recorder,
fax machine, telex, or pager.

"Employee" means a person who
performs services for hire for not fewer than six consecutive months for the
employer from whom benefits are sought under this chapter.

"Health care provider" means a
physician as defined under section 386-1.

"Sexual assault" means any conduct
proscribed by chapter 707, part V.

"Stalking" means engaging in a course
of conduct directed at a specifically targeted person that would cause a
reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress or to fear bodily
injury, sexual assault, or death to the person or to the person's spouse,
parent, child, or any other person who regularly resides in the person's
household, and where the conduct does cause the targeted person to have such
distress or fear.

"Victim services organization"
includes:

(1) A nonprofit, nongovernmental organization that
provides assistance to victims of domestic or sexual violence or to advocates
for such victims, including a rape crisis center;

(2) An organization operating a shelter or providing
professional counseling services; or

(3) An organization providing assistance through the
legal process. [L 2003, c 60, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next